Utah, session 2026, HB569.
Section 1. Section 35A-17-101 is amended to read:35A-17-101. Definitions.As used in this section:(1)"SNAP" means the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, 7 U.S.C. Chapter 51.(2)"SNAP benefit" means a financial benefit, coupon, or privilege available under SNAP.(3)(a)"Soft drink" means a nonalcoholic beverage that is made with carbonated water and that is flavored and sweetened with sugar or artificial sweeteners.(b)"Soft drink" does not include a beverage that contains milk, milk products, soy, rice, or other milk substitutes, or that is greater than 50% vegetable or fruit juice by volume.(4)"Ultra-processed food" means the same as that term is defined in department rule in accordance with Section 35A-17-102.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 35A-17-102 is amended to read:35A-17-102. SNAP waiver request -- Requirements -- Reporting.(1)(a)On or before July 1, 2025, the The department shall submit a request for a federal waiver to the United States Department of Agriculture, Food and Nutrition Service, to authorize the department to prohibit the use of SNAP benefits for the purchase of soft drinks.(b)No later than three months180 days after the day on which the United States Department of Health and Human Services defines the term ultra-processed food, the department shall:(i)define the term ultra-processed food in rule, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;(ii)submit the definition of ultra-processed food to the Rules Review and General Oversight Committee for review; and(iii)submit a request for a federal waiver to the United States Department of Agriculture, Food and Nutrition Service, to authorize the department to prohibit the use of SNAP benefits for the purchase of ultra-processed food.(c)The waiver request described in Subsection (1)(a)Subsections (1)(a) and (b) shall include:(i) justification for the waiver, including:(A)public health concerns;(B)SNAP's statutory intent; and(C)cost savings to taxpayers;(ii)an implementation plan to ensure that existing point-of-sale systems used by Utah retailers are able to enforce the waiver restrictions;(iii)a strategy for education and outreach to inform SNAP recipients of alternative healthy food options; and(iv)a mechanism to track the impact of the waiver restrictions on SNAP recipients, including:(A)spending patterns; and(B)health outcomes.(2)(a)If the waiver under Subsection (1) is approved by Food and Nutrition Services, the department shall implement the SNAP benefits restriction under Subsection (1) no later than six months after the day on which the waiver is granted.(b)If the waiver under Subsection (1) is denied, the department shall:(i)resubmit the request for a waiver no later than three months after the day on which the waiver is denied; and(ii)resubmit the request annually until a waiver approval is granted.(3)(a)On or before November 1 of each year, the department shall provide a written report to the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee detailing:(i)the status of the waiver request;(ii)data on SNAP spending patterns in Utah;(iii)any identified challenges with SNAP; and(iv)any recommendations for further policy action.(b)The report described in Subsection (3)(a) shall be included in the department's annual report in accordance with Section 35A-1-109.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.